Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.515

High school directory information—Transmittal to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(1) Beginning in 2024, each school district that operates a high school shall annually transmit directory information for all enrolled high school students to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by November 1st.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must hold the high school student directory information collected under this section and make the information available for the Washington student achievement council and institutions of higher education in accordance with RCW 28B.10.041.

(3) By no later than the beginning of the 2025-26 school year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify a process for making information provided in accordance with RCW 28B.10.041(2) on a student's enrollment in an institution of higher education available to the student's school district. The process identified under this subsection (3) must require that information provided to school districts include the statewide student identifier for each student.

(4) In transmitting student information under this section, school districts must comply with the consent procedures under RCW 28A.605.030, the federal family educational and privacy rights act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), and all applicable rules and regulations.

(5) The student directory information data collected under this section is solely for the following purposes:

(a) Providing information related to college awareness and admissions at institutions of higher education in accordance with RCW 28B.10.041;

(b) Providing information related to postsecondary financial aid and educational opportunities in accordance with RCW 28B.10.041; and

(c) Providing enrollment and outcome information to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and to school districts related to students from their respective school district under subsection (3) of this section.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Directory information" means the names, addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers of students and their parents or legal guardians; and

(b) "Statewide student identifier" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.041.

[ 2024 c 324 s 2; 2023 c 406 s 2.]